Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.181

Surcharge for prosecution of mortgage lending fraud—Transmittal to state treasurer. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a surcharge of one dollar shall be charged by the county auditor at the time of recording of each deed of trust, which will be in addition to any other charge authorized by law. The auditor may retain up to five percent of the funds collected to administer collection. The remaining funds shall be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer who will deposit the funds into the mortgage lending fraud prosecution account created in RCW 43.320.140. The department of financial institutions is responsible for the distribution of the funds in the account and shall, in consultation with the attorney general and local prosecutors, develop rules for the use of these funds to pursue criminal prosecution of fraudulent activities within the mortgage lending process.

(2) The surcharge imposed in this section does not apply to assignments or substitutions of previously recorded deeds of trust.

(3) This section expires June 30, 2027.

[ 2021 c 31 s 1; 2016 c 7 s 2; 2011 c 129 s 2; 2006 c 21 s 1; 2003 c 289 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 31: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 14, 2021]." [ 2021 c 31 s 3.]

Effective date—2011 c 129: See note following RCW 43.320.140.